netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="la_lqf_A_wanAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_A_wanAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_wanAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_wanAxi_iR"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_wanAxi_iR"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_wanAxi_s">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_wanAxi_s"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_wanAxi_s"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_wanAxi_R">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_wanAxi_R"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_wanAxi_R"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_P_kryAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_P_iR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_P_kryAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_P_IR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_P_kryAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_P_s"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_P_kryAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_P_R"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_A_kryAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_A_kryAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_A_kryAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_A_kryAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_kryAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_kryAxi_iR"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_kryAxi_iR"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_kryAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_kryAxi_IR"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_kryAxi_IR"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_kryAxi_s">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_kryAxi_s"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_kryAxi_s"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_kryAxi_R">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_kryAxi_R"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_kryAxi_R"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="la_lqf_P_curAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="ma_ay"/><par n="la_lqf_P_iR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_P_curAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_P_s"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_P_curAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_P_R"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_A_curAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="ma_ay"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_A_curAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_A_curAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karwari"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_curAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_curAxi_iR"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_curAxi_s">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_curAxi_s"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_curAxi_s"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_U_curAxi_R">
        <e><par n="la_lqf_P_curAxi_R"/></e>
        <e><par n="la_lqf_A_curAxi_R"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- KARMANI -->

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak">
        <e><p><l>yawe</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lat"/><s n="11"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yewe</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lat"/><s n="12"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yanwe</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lat"/><s n="13"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yase</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lat"/><s n="21"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yeWe</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lat"/><s n="22"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yaXve</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lat"/><s n="23"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lat"/><s n="31"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yAvahe</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lat"/><s n="32"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yAmahe</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lat"/><s n="33"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lot_yak">
        <e><p><l>yawAm</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lot"/><s n="11"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yewAm</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lot"/><s n="12"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yanwAm</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lot"/><s n="13"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yasva</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lot"/><s n="21"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yeWAm</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lot"/><s n="22"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yaXvam</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lot"/><s n="23"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yE</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lot"/><s n="31"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yAvahE</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lot"/><s n="32"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yAmahE</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="lot"/><s n="33"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_laf_yak">
        <e><p><l>yawa</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="laf"/><s n="11"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yewAm</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="laf"/><s n="12"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yanwa</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="laf"/><s n="13"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yaWAH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="laf"/><s n="21"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yeWAm</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="laf"/><s n="22"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yaXvam</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="laf"/><s n="23"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="laf"/><s n="31"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yAvahi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="laf"/><s n="32"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yAmahi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="laf"/><s n="33"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_viXilif_yak">
        <e><p><l>yewa</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="viXilif"/><s n="11"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yeyAwAm</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="viXilif"/><s n="12"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yeran</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="viXilif"/><s n="13"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yeWAH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="viXilif"/><s n="21"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yeyAWAm</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="viXilif"/><s n="22"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yeXvam</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="viXilif"/><s n="23"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yeya</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="viXilif"/><s n="31"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yevahi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="viXilif"/><s n="32"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yemahi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/><s n="viXilif"/><s n="33"/><s n="AP"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_axAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi">
        <e><par n="la_lat_yak"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="SrA2"><i>SrA</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="rA1"><i>rA</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="prA1"><i>prA</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="xA3"><i>x</i><par n="mr_A_I"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="hA2"><i>h</i><par n="mr_A_I"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="i1"><par n="mr_i_I"/><i></i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="xIXI1"><i>xIXI</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="hrI1"><i>hrI</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="mI1"><i>mI</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="plu1"><i>pl</i><par n="mr_u_U"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="ru2"><i>r</i><par n="mr_u_U"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Rnu1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>n</i><par n="mr_u_U"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="ku2"><i>k</i><par n="mr_u_U"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="hu1"><i>h</i><par n="mr_u_U"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="xU1"><i>xU</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="pq1"><i>p</i><par n="mr_q_ri"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="gq2"><i>g</i><par n="mr_q_ri"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="q2"><i></i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="pQ1"><i>p</i><par n="mr_Q_Ur"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Rvap1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><par n="mr_va_u"/><i>p</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="sqnB1"><i>sq</i><par n="md_n"/><i>B</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="ranj2"><i>ra</i><par n="md_n"/><i>j</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="bax1"><i>bax</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="xrAG1"><i>xrAG</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="kac2"><i>ka</i><par n="ma_F"/><i>c</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="jaj1"><i>jaj</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="vat1"><i>vat</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="ad1"><i>ad</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="way1"><i>way</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Sarv1"><i>Sarv</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="pruR1"><i>pruR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="kul1"><i>kul</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Id1"><i>Id</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Sij1"><i>Si</i><par n="ma_F"/><i>j</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="rux1"><i>rux</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="vij1"><i>vij</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Bas1"><i>Bas</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="wur1"><i>wur</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Xan1"><i>Xan</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="knas1"><i>knas</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="guX1"><i>guX</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="RwIm1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>wIm</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="vAvqw1"><i>vAvqw</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="yuj1"><i>yu</i><par n="mr_j_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="NaS1"><par n="mr_N_n"/><i>aS</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="as3"><i>as</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="kqS1"><i>kqS</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="mix3"><i>mix</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
